Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202657-1411
Public Service Commission Pipeline Regulation Fund; created; use; investment.

The Public Service Commission Pipeline Regulation Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the commission. The fund shall be used by the commission to carry out the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Public Service Commission Pipeline Regulation Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 137.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.